Tennessee, session 114, SB1665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the language "names and pronouns" and substituting instead "names, pronouns, and
honorifics".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102, is amended by deleting
the language "pronoun" wherever it appears in subsections (b) and (c) and substituting instead
"pronoun or honorific".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(d), is amended by
deleting the language "pronouns" wherever it appears and substituting instead "pronouns or
honorifics" and by deleting the language "pronoun or title" and substituting instead "pronoun,
title, or honorific".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(e), is amended by
deleting the language "preferred name or preferred pronoun" wherever it appears in subdivision
(1) and substituting instead "preferred name, pronoun, or honorific" and by deleting the
language "pronouns" wherever it appears in subdivision (2) and substituting instead "pronouns
or honorifics".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-2409(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the language "names or pronouns" and substituting instead "names, pronouns, and
honorifics".
SB1665
010345
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-2409, is amended by deleting
the language "pronoun" wherever it appears in subsections (b) and (c) and substituting instead
"pronoun or honorific" and by deleting the language "pronouns" in subsection (d) and
substituting instead "pronouns or honorifics".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-121(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the language "names and pronouns" and substituting instead "names, pronouns, and
honorifics".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-121, is amended by deleting the
language "pronoun" wherever it appears in subsections (b) and (c) and substituting instead
"pronoun or honorific" and by deleting "pronouns" wherever it appears in subsection (d) and
substituting instead "pronouns or honorifics".
SECTION 9. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010345